Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB135.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 508.025 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of assault in the third degree when the actor:
(a) Recklessly, with a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument, or intentionally
causes or attempts to cause physical injury to:
1. A state, county, city, or federal peace officer;
2. An employee of a detention facility, or state residential treatment facility
or state staff secure facility for residential treatment which provides for
the care, treatment, or detention of a juvenile charged with or
adjudicated delinquent because of a public offense or as a youthful
offender;
3. A healthcare provider as defined in KRS 311.821 or other person
employed by or under contract with a health clinic, doctor's office,
dental office, long-term care facility, hospital, or a hospital-owned or
affiliate outpatient facility, if the event occurs in or on the premises of a
health clinic, doctor's office, dental office, long-term care facility,
hospital, or a hospital-owned or affiliate outpatient facility;
4. An employee of the Department for Community Based Services
employed as a social worker to provide direct client services, if the
event occurs while the worker is performing job-related duties;
5. Paid or volunteer emergency medical services personnel certified or
licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 311A, if the event occurs while
personnel are performing job-related duties;
6. A paid or volunteer member of an organized fire department, if the
event occurs while the member is performing job-related duties;
7. Paid or volunteer rescue squad personnel affiliated with the Division of
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/27/2024 8:10 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 991
Emergency Management of the Department of Military Affairs or a
local disaster and emergency services organization pursuant to KRS
Chapter 39F, if the event occurs while personnel are performing job-
related duties;
8. A probation and parole officer;
9. A transportation officer appointed by a county fiscal court or legislative
body of a consolidated local government, urban-county government, or
charter government to transport inmates when the county jail or county
correctional facility is closed while the transportation officer is
performing job-related duties;
10. A public or private elementary or secondary school or school district
classified or certified employee, school bus driver, or other school
employee acting in the course and scope of the employee's employment;
[or]
11. A public or private elementary or secondary school or school district
volunteer acting in the course and scope of that person's volunteer
service for the school or school district; or
12. A driver of any form of public transportation acting in the course and
scope of the driver's employment;
(b) Being a person confined in a detention facility, or a juvenile in a state
residential treatment facility or state staff secure facility for residential
treatment which provides for the care, treatment, or detention of a juvenile
charged with or adjudicated delinquent because of a public offense or as a
youthful offender, inflicts physical injury upon or throws or causes feces, or
urine, or other bodily fluid to be thrown upon an employee of the facility; or
(c) Intentionally causes a person, whom the actor knows or reasonably should
know to be a peace officer discharging official duties, to come into contact
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/27/2024 8:10 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 991
with saliva, vomit, mucus, blood, seminal fluid, urine, or feces without the
consent of the peace officer.
(2) (a) For a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, assault in the third degree
is a Class D felony, unless the offense occurs during a declared emergency as
defined by KRS 39A.020 arising from a natural or man-made disaster, within
the area covered by the emergency declaration, and within the area impacted
by the disaster, in which case it is a Class C felony.
(b) For a violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section, assault in the third degree
is a Class D felony.
(c) For violations of subsection (1)(c) of this section, assault in the third degree is
a Class B misdemeanor, unless the assault is with saliva, vomit, mucus, blood,
seminal fluid, urine, or feces from an adult who knows that he or she has a
serious communicable disease and competent medical or epidemiological
evidence demonstrates that the specific type of contact caused by the actor is
likely to cause transmission of the disease or condition, in which case it is a
Class A misdemeanor.
(d) As used in paragraph (c) of this subsection, "serious communicable disease"
means a non-airborne disease that is transmitted from person to person and
determined to have significant, long-term consequences on the physical health
or life activities of the person infected.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/27/2024 8:10 AM Jacketed